apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="capi/sce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>sce</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>scu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sci</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sce</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scemu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scenu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scamu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scate</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scanu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>scendu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cunn/osce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>osce</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oscu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>osci</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>osce</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscemu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iscimu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscite</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oscenu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iscia</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>isciutu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isciuta</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isciuti</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isciute</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>oscendu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>



    </pardef>



    <pardef n="/esce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>esce</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>escu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esci</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esce</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscemu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscite</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>escenu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>esca</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esca</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esca</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscamu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscate</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>escanu</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>escerà</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sciut</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>esciut</l><r>esce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/andà__vblex">
      <e><p><l>andà</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anda</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>

      <e><p><l>vacu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vai</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>và</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andemu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andate</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vanu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>andava</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andavanu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>anderà</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anderanu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>andatu</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andata</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andati</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>andate</l><r>andà<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/à__vblex">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>

      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>acciu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aci</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ace</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>acenu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>acini</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>acia</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>acianu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>erà</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>arà</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eranu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>att</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>

      <e><p><l>endu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>



      <e><p><l>eci</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>



    </pardef>

    <e lm="andà"><i></i><par n="/andà__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fà"><i>f</i><par n="f/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esce"><i></i><par n="/esce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="riesce"><i>ri</i><par n="/esce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunnosce"><i>cunn</i><par n="cunn/osce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricunnosce"><i>ricunn</i><par n="cunn/osce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="capisce"><i>capi</i><par n="capi/sce__vblex"/></e>
